Connecticut, session 2026, SB00212.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to establish a tax credit equal
to any increase in premium costs that exceed two per cent of premiums
paid annually to purchase an individual or group long-term care
insurance policy during a taxable year, and allow long-term care
policyholders to carry such credit over to future taxable years.